Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1116
Compliance with act; required; when.

A viatical settlement provider and viatical settlement broker transacting business in this state on or before September 1, 2001, may continue to do so pending approval or disapproval of the provider's or broker's application for a license as long as the application is filed with the director by July 1, 2002.

Laws 2001, LB 52, § 42.